District of Columbia statutes.
19-1304.01

Methods of creating trust.

A trust may be created by:

(1)

Transfer of property to another person as trustee during the settlor’s lifetime or by will or other disposition taking effect upon the settlor’s death;

(2)

Declaration by the owner of property that the owner holds identifiable property as trustee;

(3)

Exercise of a power of appointment in favor of a trustee; or

(4)

A court for the benefit of an individual in lieu of a transfer of property to a conservatorship or guardianship pursuant to Chapter 1 or subchapter VI of Chapter 20 of Title 21 of the District of Columbia Official Code.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 401 of the Uniform Trust Code.